Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
State Archives and Records

171.410.
Definitions for KRS 171.420 to 171.740.

As used in KRS

171.420

to

171.740

:

“Public record or record” means all books, papers, maps, photographs, cards, tapes, disks, diskettes, recordings, and other documentary materials, regardless of physical form or characteristics, which are prepared, owned, used, in the possession of or retained by a public agency. “Public record” shall not include any records owned by a private person or corporation that are not related to functions, activities, programs or operations funded by state or local authority;

“Department” means the Department for Libraries and Archives;

“Commission” means the State Archives and Records Commission; and

“Public agency” means every state or local office, state department, division, bureau, board, commission and authority; every legislative board, commission, committee and officer; every county and city governing body, council, school district board, special district board, municipal corporation, and any board, department, commission, committee, subcommittee, ad hoc committee, council or agency thereof; and any other body which is created by state or local authority and which derives at least twenty-five percent (25%) of its funds from state or local authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 1; 1962, ch. 106, Art. V, § 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 159; 1970, ch. 92, § 32; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VIII, B, § 2; 1982, ch. 245, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 150, § 3, effective July 15, 1986.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Fiscal court claims which have been paid would come within the definition of “records” as used in KRS

171.410

to

171.740

.

OAG 61-831

.

Fiscal court claims which have been paid and tax rolls come within the definition of “records.”

OAG 61-831

.

Neither the interested person nor his representative has the right to reproduce the records of a district board of education by any photostatic means whatsoever.

OAG 68-291

.

Neither an interested person nor his representative has the absolute right to take the original records of a district board of education into a private room without the secretary or the secretary’s representative being present.

OAG 68-291

.

Where the necessary interest is present, the interested person or his representative is entitled to obtain a certified copy of the contract between the board of education and the secretary upon payment of such reasonable fee therefor as may be prescribed by regulation of the district board.

OAG 68-291

.

Information concerning textbook titles and course enrollment requested by a private bookstore would be a part of the university’s records and would be subject to the statutory privilege of inspection by any interested person.

OAG 69-24

.

Disposal of municipal records is subject to the rules and regulations of the Archives and Records Commission.

OAG 69-108

.

As the daily “minute sheets” of the clerks of the circuit Court contain no information which is not being permanently preserved elsewhere in the Circuit Court’s records, their destruction, once the official orders have been taken from them, would constitute neither a criminal act under KRS

519.060

nor an infringement on the authority of the State Archives and Records Commission under this section.

OAG 75-103

.

It is apparent from the 1982 amendment to subdivision (1) of this section, which added cards, tapes, disks and recordings to the definition of “records,” that it was the intent of the legislature to facilitate the maintenance of public records by modernizing the means of preserving those records; therefore, it appears that Kentucky law does permit Kentucky State University to maintain its records via microfilm microfiche.

OAG 83-161

.

The fiscal court should provide sufficient space to store case reports, evidence from death scenes, photographs and autopsy reports for the period of usefulness to the coroner in carrying out his work; since there is no statute expressly dealing with the retention time or final disposal, in the absence of a court order, or the applicable storage of such records by State Archives, the coroner should use his good judgment in disposing of items no longer needed.

OAG 84-246

.

A housing authority established and operating pursuant to KRS Chapter 80 is required to comply with KRS

171.410

through

171.990

, dealing with state archives and records.

OAG 84-375

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Court records, control by Supreme Court, KRS

26A.200

,

26A.210

.

Open records law, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

171.420.
State Libraries, Archives, and Records Commission.

The State Libraries, Archives, and Records Commission is hereby created and shall be a seventeen (17) member body constituted as follows:

The state librarian or his or her designee, who shall be the chairperson of the commission;

The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet or his or her designee, who shall serve as vice chairperson;

The Auditor of Public Accounts or his or her designee;

The state law librarian or his or her designee;

The director of the Legislative Research Commission or his or her designee;

The Attorney General or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Kentucky Military Heritage Commission or a designee of the commission;

The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology or his or her designee;

The president of the Kentucky Association of School Librarians or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Kentucky Historical Society or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Kentucky Library Association or his or her designee;

The president of the Council on Postsecondary Education or his or her designee;

Four (4) citizens at large appointed by the Governor, including one (1) member representing library users with disabilities, one (1) member representing disadvantaged persons, and two (2) members representing library users; and

One (1) member, who shall not be an elected official, appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons, with one (1) name submitted by each of the presidents of the Kentucky League of Cities, the Kentucky Association of Counties, and the Kentucky Association of School Administrators.

Vacancies for appointed members shall be filled by the Governor in the same manner as initial appointments are made. All appointed members shall serve for a term of three (3) years, except when making the appointments under subsection (3) of this section, two (2) shall be for a term of three (3) years, two (2) for two (2) years, and one (1) for one (1) year.

On July 14, 2018, all terms of gubernatorial appointees made prior to July 14, 2018, shall expire, and the Governor shall appoint five (5) members to the commission in accordance with paragraphs (m) and (n) of subsection (1) of this section.

The commission shall be the state advisory council on libraries and shall advise the Department for Libraries and Archives on matters relating to federal and state library development issues, archives and records management, federal and state funding, public library standards, and other federal and state library service issues. The commission shall have the authority to review and approve schedules for retention and destruction of records submitted by state and local agencies. In all cases, the commission shall determine questions which relate to destruction of public records, and their decision shall be binding on the parties concerned and final, except that the commission may reconsider or modify its actions upon the agreement of a simple majority of the membership present and voting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 2; 1962, ch. 106, Art. V, § 3; 1970, ch. 92, § 33; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2); 1974, ch. 257, § 5; 1976, ch. 242, § 1; 1978, ch. 384, § 120, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 245, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 185, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 209, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 506, § 20, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 20, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 602, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 111, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 56, effective June 25, 2009; 2018 ch. 176, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 236, § 90, effective July 1, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2006). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(c) and for the sake of clarity, the Reviser of Statutes has divided this statute as contained in 2006 Ky. Act ch. 211, sec. 111, into numbered subsections and paragraphs.

Opinions of Attorney General.

State agencies should not destroy public records, such as the Register of Births and Deaths, without the authority of the Archives and Records Commission, except under specific circumstances and therefore, such an order sent by the Cabinet for Human Resources without the approval of the Archives and Records Commission was invalid.

OAG 91-25

.

171.430.
Expenses of commission members.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation other than actual expense of attending meetings of the commission or while in the performance of their official duties in connection with the business of the commission.

History.

Enact. 1958, ch. 49, § 3, effective June 19, 1958.

171.440.
Commission meetings.

The commission shall meet in the City of Frankfort, but the commission may, by majority vote, hold special or regular meetings in other locations when the work of the commission would be facilitated thereby. The commission shall hold not less than four (4) meetings during each calendar year and may hold such special meetings as may be necessary to transact the business of the commission. All meetings shall be called by the chairman, or when requested in writing by any two (2) members of the commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 4; 1982, ch. 245, § 3, effective July 15, 1982.

171.450.
Department procedures and regulations.

The department shall establish:

Procedures for the compilation and submission to the department of lists and schedules of public records proposed for disposal;

Procedures for the disposal or destruction of public records authorized for disposal or destruction, including appropriate procedures to protect against unauthorized access to or use of personal information as defined by KRS

61.931

;

Standards and procedures for recording, managing, and preserving public records and for the reproduction of public records by photographic or microphotographic process; and

Procedures for collection and distribution by the central depository of all reports and publications, except the Kentucky Revised Statutes editions, issued by any department, board, commission, officer or other agency of the Commonwealth for general public distribution after July 1, 1958.

The department shall enforce the provisions of KRS

171.410

to

171.740

by appropriate rules and regulations.

The department shall make copies of such rules and regulations available to all officials affected by KRS

171.410

to

171.740

subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.

Such rules and regulations when approved by the department shall be binding on all state and local agencies, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A. The department shall perform any acts deemed necessary, legal and proper to carry out the duties and responsibilities imposed upon it pursuant to the authority granted herein.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 5; 1970, ch. 92, § 34; 1982, ch. 245, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 353, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2014, ch. 74, § 8, effective January 1, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(10/5/90). Pursuant to KRS 7.136(1), KRS Chapter 13A has been substituted for the prior reference to KRS Chapter 13 in this statute. The sections in KRS Chapter 13 were repealed by 1984 Ky. Acts ch. 417, § 36 and KRS Chapter 13A was created in that same chapter of the 1984 Ky. Acts.

(1/1/2015). 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 74, sec. 10 provided that “the provisions of this Act shall not impact the provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.” That proviso applies to this statute as amended in Section 8 of that Act.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Requests for disposal or destruction of the records of the office of county treasurer must be submitted to the State Archives and Records Commission for determination and the request must be initially channeled through the Director of State Archives and Records Service.

OAG 65-207

.

Disposal of municipal records is subject to the rules and regulations of the Archives and Records Commission.

OAG 69-108

.

There is no statutory authority to permit a delegation of the function of making the final decision as to the inclusion or exclusion of documents to be deposited with the Department of Library and Archives (now Department for Libraries and Archives) to the Director of the Department.

OAG 75-114

.

The state’s departments, boards, and agencies cannot be themselves required to distribute to depository libraries, copies of their reports and publications issued for general public distribution since this function is specifically reserved to the Department of Library and Archives (now Department for Libraries and Archives) as the central depository for state records but can be required to deposit a sufficient number for distribution.

OAG 75-114

.

171.460.
Records management survey.

In order for proper planning to be accomplished, the department shall cause a records management survey to be conducted in accordance with the regulations issued by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 6; 1970, ch. 92, § 35.

171.470.
Records management promotion — Reports.

The department is authorized to make continuing surveys of government records and records management and disposal practices and to obtain reports thereon from state and local agencies; to promote, in cooperation with the various state and local agencies, improved records management practices and controls in such agencies, including the central storage or disposition of records not needed by such agencies for their current use; and to report to the Governor semiannually. The department shall submit a biennial report to the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 7; 1970, ch. 92, § 36.

171.480.
Buildings and facilities.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, at the request of the commission, shall have authority to design, build, purchase, lease, maintain, operate, protect, and improve buildings or facilities, including a state archives and records center building, used for the storage of noncurrent records of state and local agencies. The cabinet shall have custody and control of all such buildings and facilities and their contents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 8; 1970, ch. 92, § 37.

171.490.
Archives and Records Service. [Repealed.]

171.500.
Central depository.

The department is hereby constituted the central depository for public records. It shall be the duty of all departments, boards, commissions, officers or other agencies of the Commonwealth to supply to the central depository copies of each of their reports and publications issued for general public distribution after July 1, 1958, in the number and in the manner prescribed by rule or regulation promulgated by the department pursuant to KRS

171.450

. College, university, and public libraries may be constituted depository libraries by written order of the department. The central depository shall supply copies to such depository libraries in the number and in the manner prescribed by rule or regulation promulgated by the department pursuant to KRS

171.450

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 10; 1970, ch. 92, § 38.

171.510.
Advisory groups for commission.

The commission may from time to time appoint advisory groups to more effectively obtain the best professional thinking of the bar, historians, political scientists, accountants, genealogists, patriotic groups, and associations of public officials on the steps to be taken with regard to any particular group or type of records.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 11, effective June 19, 1958.

171.520.
Supervision of state and local agencies — Plan for comprehensive records management system for state government — Rules and regulations.

The department shall, with due regard to the program activities of the state and local agencies concerned, prescribe the policies and principles to be followed by state and local agencies in the conduct of their records management programs, and make provisions for the economical and efficient management of records by state and local agencies by analyzing, developing, promoting, and coordinating standards, procedures, and techniques designed to improve the management of records, to insure the maintenance and security of records deemed appropriate for preservation, and to facilitate the segregation and disposal of records of temporary value and by promoting the efficient and economical utilization of space, equipment, and supplies needed for the purpose of creating, maintaining, storing, and servicing records. The department may accept, administer and grant any money appropriated or granted to it, in addition to appropriations from the general fund, for providing and improving records management programs of state and local agencies.

To effect the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall prepare a plan for a comprehensive records management system for Kentucky state government. This plan shall include a proposal for funding through cost allocation or other methods in lieu of a general fund appropriation. The plan shall provide for a records management certification program, to identify state agencies in compliance with records management practices implemented by the department, and shall be completed by July 1, 1987. The plan shall be submitted to the Office of Policy and Management and the Legislative Research Commission for evaluation.

The department shall promulgate necessary rules and regulations for the furtherance of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 12; 1970, ch. 92, § 39; 1984, ch. 172, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 66, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county desiring to destroy or dispose of records must do so in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Archives and Records Commission, and in the absence of such rule or regulation must secure prior approval of the Commission.

OAG 60-835

.

Disposal of municipal records is subject to the rules and regulations of the Archives and Records Commission.

OAG 69-108

.

The preservation or disposal of election records would be controlled by the State Division of Archives and Records.

OAG 72-385

.

171.530.
Retention and recovery of records.

The commission shall establish standards for the selective retention of records of continuing value, and the department shall assist state and local agencies in applying such standards to records in their custody. The department shall notify the head of any such agency of any actual, impending, or threatening unlawful removal, defacing, alteration, or destruction of records in the custody of such agency that has come to its attention, and initiate action through the agency head or Attorney General for the recovery of such records as shall have been unlawfully removed and for such other redress as may be provided by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 13; 1970, ch. 92, § 40; 1982, ch. 245, § 5, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county desiring to destroy or dispose of records must do so in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Archives and Records Commission, and in the absence of such rule or regulation must secure prior approval of the Commission.

OAG 60-835

.

Disposal of municipal records is subject to the rules and regulations of the archives and Records Commission.

OAG 69-108

.

Where records have not been unlawfully removed but are threatened with an unauthorized transfer, the department may enjoin their removal.

OAG 78-519

.

Since the Open Records Act does not regulate management practices of keeping public records and since the Attorney General’s decisions are limited to whether a requested document is in the possession of a public agency and whether such document is subject to public inspection, the request that university, in not identifying one person as the official custodian in charge of enforcing proper records keeping practices, be charged with violating the Open Records Act, as well as the request for provision of a copy of the contract of the person thought to be the official custodian of the university’s records, were denied. OAG 94-ORD-8.

Although the Attorney General may be called on to intervene in the recovery of records when it comes to the attention of the Department for Library and Archives that those records are threatened with unlawful removal, defacing, alteration, or destruction pursuant to this section, he is not empowered to issue a legally enforceable decision relative to those acts; his decisions under the Open Records Act are limited to the question of whether the agency violated the provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

. OAG 94-ORD-12.

171.540.
Inspection of agency records.

The department is authorized to inspect or survey the records of any state or local agency, as well as to make surveys of records management and records disposal practices in such agencies, and shall be given full cooperation of officials and employees of agencies in such inspection and surveys; provided, that records, the use of which is restricted by or pursuant to law or for reasons of security or the public interest, shall be inspected or surveyed only in accordance with law, and the rules and regulations of the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 14; 1970, ch. 92, § 41.

171.550.
Processing and servicing records.

The department is authorized to establish an interim records center or centers for the storage, processing, and servicing of records of state and local agencies pending their deposit in the State Archives and Records Center or their disposition in any other manner authorized by law, and to establish, maintain and operate centralized microfilming, photostating, indexing, decontamination and lamination and any other records repair and rehabilitation services for state and local agencies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 15; 1970, ch. 92, § 42.

171.560.
Transfer of records.

Subject to applicable provisions of law, the department shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the transfer of records from the custody of one (1) state or local agency to that of another.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 16; 1970, ch. 92, § 43.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Neither this section nor regulation 725 KAR 1:030 § 3 gives authority to any person or agency to transfer records without the approval of the department.

OAG 78-519

.

The Department of Library and Archives (now Department for Libraries and Archives) has plenary authority under this section to prohibit the transfer of any public record as defined in KRS

171.410

(1) from state or local government offices to the University of Louisville.

OAG 78-519

.

Should the Department for Libraries and Archives elect to authorize the transfer of copies of the Register of Births and Deaths to other agencies, a disclaimer should be placed inside each of the volumes of the Register which would indicate that the information contained in the Register may not be accurate and that the Register does not represent an update-to-date listing of Kentucky births and deaths.

OAG 91-25

.

171.570.
Extension of agency retention period.

The department may empower any state or local agency, upon the submission of evidence of the need therefor, to retain records for a longer period than that specified in any approved disposal schedule, or by law but the agency shall report all such actions to the commission at its next meeting for approval or disapproval.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 17; 1966, ch. 255, § 160; 1970, ch. 92, § 44.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Disposal of municipal records is subject to the rules and regulations of the Archives and Records Commission.

OAG 69-108

.

171.580.
Historical records.

The department, whenever it appears to be in the public interest, is authorized:

To accept for deposit in the State Archives and Records Center the records of any state or local agency or of the General Assembly that are determined by the department to have sufficient historical or other value to warrant their continued preservation;

To direct and effect the transfer to the department of any records that have been in existence for more than fifty (50) years and that are determined by the department to have sufficient historical or other value to warrant their continued preservation, unless the head of the state or local agency which has custody of them certifies in writing to the department that they must be retained in his custody for use in the conduct of the regular current business of the said agency;

To direct and effect, with the approval of the head of the originating agency, or its successor, if any, the transfer of records deposited, or approved for deposit, in the State Archives and Records Center to public or educational institutions for special research or exhibit purposes; provided that title to such records shall remain vested in the Commonwealth of Kentucky unless otherwise authorized by law, and provided further such records may be recalled after reasonable notice in writing;

To direct and effect the transfer of materials from private sources authorized to be received by the State Archives and Records Center by the provisions of KRS

171.620

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 18; 1970, ch. 92, § 45.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Should the Department for Libraries and Archives elect to authorize the transfer of copies of the Register of Births and Deaths to other agencies, a disclaimer should be placed inside each of the volumes of the Register which would indicate that the information contained in the Register may not be accurate and that the Register does not represent an update-to-update listing of Kentucky births and deaths.

OAG 91-25

.

171.590.
Public nature of records in department’s custody.

The department shall be responsible for the custody, use, and withdrawal of records transferred to it. All papers, books, and other records of any matters so transferred are public records and shall be open to inspection by any interested person subject to reasonable rules as to time and place of inspection established by the department; provided that whenever any records, the use of which is subject to statutory limitations and restrictions, are so transferred, the department shall enforce such limitations. Restrictions shall not remain in effect after the records have been in existence for fifty (50) years.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 19; 1970, ch. 92, § 46.

171.600.
Servicing records.

The department shall make provisions for the preservation, management, repair and rehabilitation, duplication and reproduction, description, and exhibition of records or related documentary material transferred to it as may be needful or appropriate, including the preparation and duplication of inventories, indexes, catalogs, and other finding aids or guides facilitating their use.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 20; 1970, ch. 92, § 47.

171.610.
Facilities for public inspection.

The department shall make such provision and maintain such facilities as it deems necessary or desirable for servicing records in its custody that are not exempt from examination by statutory provisions or other restrictions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 21; 1970, ch. 92, § 48.

171.620.
Private documents of public interest.

The department is authorized, whenever it is deemed to be in the public interest, to accept for deposit:

The papers and other historical materials of any Governor of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or of any other official or former official of the state or its subdivisions, and other papers relating to and contemporary with any Governor or former Governor of Kentucky, subject to restrictions agreeable to the department and the donor;

Documents, including motion picture films, still pictures, sound recordings, maps, and papers, from private sources that are appropriate for preservation by the state government as evidence of its organization, functions, policies, and transactions or those of its subdivisions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 22; 1970, ch. 92, § 49.

171.630.
Reproduction fee.

The department may charge a fee not in excess of ten percent (10%) above the costs or expenses for making or authenticating copies or reproductions of materials transferred to its custody. All such fees shall be paid into a revolving fund for the continuation of such services on as self-sustaining a basis as possible. There shall be no charge for making or authenticating copies or reproductions of such materials for official use by the government of the Commonwealth of Kentucky; provided that reimbursement may be accepted to cover the cost of furnishing such copies or reproductions that could not otherwise be furnished.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 23; 1970, ch. 92, § 50.

171.640.
Documentation of agency matters — Standards, rules and regulations.

The head of each state or local agency shall cause to be made and preserved records containing adequate and proper documentation of the organizational functions, policies, decisions, procedures, and essential transactions of the agency and designed to furnish information necessary to protect the legal and financial rights of the government and of persons directly affected by the agency’s activities. Such documentation shall be created, managed, and preserved in accordance with standards, rules and regulations prescribed by the department under the provisions of KRS

171.410

to

171.740

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 24; 1986, ch. 66, § 2, effective July 15, 1986.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since the Open Records Act does not regulate management practices of keeping public records and since the Attorney General’s decisions are limited to whether a requested document is in the possession of a public agency and whether such document is subject to public inspection, the request that university, in not identifying one person as the official custodian in charge of enforcing proper records keeping practices, be charged with violating the Open Records Act as well as the request for provision of a copy of the contract of the person thought to be the official custodian of the university’s records were denied. OAG 94-ORD-8.

While there is certainly an essential relationship between KRS Chapter 61, the Open Records Act, and KRS Chapter 171, state archives and records, insofar as effective records management facilitates efficient governmental operation and public accountability, KRS

61.876

requires each public agency to adopt rules and regulations in conformity with the provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

which provision is aimed at insuring that each agency will educate the public on its particular policies and practices relative to open records; the records retention and disposal schedule envisioned by KRS Chapter 171 does not correspond to the rules and regulations for public agencies mandated by KRS

61.876

, nor are agencies required to formulate these rules and regulations under the direction of the Department for Libraries and Archives. OAG 94-ORD-12.

Because teacher council member election records are scheduled public records for purposes of records retention and management, the school’s inability to produce these records for inspection and copying because it does not maintain them constituted a subversion of the intent of both the Open Records Act and the State Archive and Records Act. OAG 01-ORD-94.

171.650.
Public nature of agency records.
[Repealed.]

171.660.
Authorized reproductions — Disposal of originals.

When the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, or any state agency or subdivision or the principal officer thereof shall reproduce and preserve for record any records or papers by photographic, microphotographic, nonerasable optical image, or other process which accurately reproduces the original records, which forms a durable medium, and which is performed in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the department, the original may be disposed of or destroyed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 26; 1970, ch. 92, § 51; 1986, ch. 223, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 37, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 88, § 82, effective July 1, 1992.

171.670.
Destruction of records.

When there is a question whether a particular record or group of records should be destroyed, the commission shall have exclusive authority to decide whether or not the record or group of records are to be destroyed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 27; 1962, ch. 106, Art. V, § 4; 1970, ch. 92, § 52; 1982, ch. 245, § 6, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county desiring to destroy or dispose of records must do so in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Archives and Records Commission, and in the absence of such rule or regulation must secure prior approval of the Commission.

OAG 60-835

.

Requests for disposal or destruction of the records of the office of county treasurer must be submitted to the State Archives and Records Commission for determination and the request must be initially channeled through the Director of State Archives and Records Service.

OAG 65-207

.

Where records are not deemed to have any current or practical value, the State Archives and Records Commission determines whether or not the particular set of records in question is to be destroyed.

OAG 65-490

.

The county court clerk can microfilm documents presented for recording in the deed, mortgage or will books and use the microfilm in lieu of his original record.

OAG 67-460

.

The county court clerk can microfilm the deed, mortgage and will books thus making microfilms the original record provided it is accomplished in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the State Archives and Records Commission.

OAG 67-460

.

Disposal of municipal records is subject to the rules and regulations of the Archives and Records Commission.

OAG 69-108

.

Where a community hospital was closed and the new hospital did not want the old patient records, permission would have to be obtained from the State Archives and Records Commission before the old records could be destroyed.

OAG 71-89

.

KRS

382.290

and

382.360

providing for marginal releases and assignments of mortgages and notes or marginal notations by the clerk do not preclude the microfilming, under the authority of KRS

171.660

and this section, of original instruments lodged for record by the county clerk, which microfilm would constitute the clerk’s record, providing the microfilming of the clerk’s records is accomplished in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Archives and Records Commission.

OAG 75-386

.

171.680.
Records management by agencies.

The head of each state and local agency shall establish and maintain an active, continuing program for the economical and efficient management of the records of the agency.

Such program shall provide for:

Effective controls over the creation, maintenance, and use of records in the conduct of current business;

Cooperation with the department in applying standards, procedures, and techniques designed to improve the management of records;

Promotion of the maintenance and security of records deemed appropriate for preservation, and facilitation of the segregation and disposal of records of temporary value;

Compliance with the provisions of KRS

171.410

to

171.740

and the rules and regulations of the department; and

Compliance with the provisions of KRS

61.931

to

61.934

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 28; 1970, ch. 92, § 53; 2014, ch. 74, § 9, effective January 1, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2015). 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 74, sec. 10 provided that “the provisions of this Act shall not impact the provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.” That proviso applies to this statute as amended in Section 9 of that Act.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The University of Kentucky subverted the intent of the Open Records Act, which is essentially related to the intent of the State Archives and Records Act, by failing to develop an adequate program for ensuring records management through agency oversight of employee records handling practices; and by failing to develop a coherent scheme for the organized maintenance of records at identified maintenance locations. OAG 94-ORD-121.

Since July 15, 1994, when the amendments to the Open Records Act took effect, there is a higher standard of review relative to denials based on the nonexistence, or the destruction, of the requested records. In order to satisfy its statutory burden of proof, a public agency must, at a minimum, document what efforts were made to locate the missing records. Because the agency failed to provide even a minimal explanation for the loss of the requested records, the agency failed to adequately manage its records. OAG 94-ORD-141.

171.690.
Storage of agency records.

Whenever the head of a state or local agency determines that substantial economies or increased operating efficiency can be effected thereby, he shall provide for the storage, processing and servicing of records that are appropriate therefor in the records center maintained and operated by the department or, when approved by the department in such location maintained and operated by the head of such agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 29; 1970, ch. 92, § 54.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county clerk may not store any records with a private storage firm without approval from the Department for Libraries and Archives, and even with such approval, can only store records with a private firm if the local agency maintains and operates the storage space.

OAG 82-283

.

171.700.
Certification of records.

Any official who is authorized to certify to facts on the basis of records in his custody is authorized to certify to facts on the basis of records that have been transferred by him or his predecessors to the department, further provided, that any fee due any official of the state or its subdivisions shall not be eliminated by KRS

171.410

to

171.740

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 30; 1970, ch. 92, § 55.

171.710.
Safeguarding agency records.

The head of each state and local agency shall establish such safeguards against removal or loss of records as he shall deem necessary and as may be required by rules and regulations issued under authority of KRS

171.410

to

171.740

. Such safeguards shall include making it known to all officials and employees of the agency that no records are to be alienated or destroyed except in accordance with law, and calling their attention to the penalties provided by law for the unlawful removal or destruction of records.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 31, effective June 19, 1958.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The University of Kentucky subverted the intent of the Open Records Act, which is essentially related to the intent of the State Archives and Records Act, by failing to develop an adequate program for ensuring records management through agency oversight of employee records handling practices. OAG 94-ORD-121.